Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner to provide for safety and security at farmers’ markets; police powers, §

2-10-57

.

Penalty for commission of aggravated assault or aggravated battery upon a peace officer, §§

16-5-21

,

16-5-24

.

Campus policemen, T. 20, C. 8.

Penalty for refusal or neglect by law enforcement officer to perform duties regarding conduct of elections, §

21-2-593

.

Duty of state and local law enforcement officers to enforce laws relating to highways, bridges, and ferries, §

32-1-9

.

Prohibition against compensation of law enforcement officers by municipal corporations by means of providing commissions or percentages of fines and forfeitures derived from arrests, §

36-30-9

.

Immunity of municipal corporations for torts of policemen, §

36-33-3

.

Management of emergencies or disasters resulting from manmade or natural causes or enemy attack, T. 38, C. 3.

Manner of operation of authorized emergency vehicles when responding to emergency calls or when in pursuit of actual or suspected violators of law, §

40-6-6

.

Use of radar speed detection devices by law enforcement officers, T. 40, C. 14.

Licensing of polygraph examiners, T. 43, C. 36.

Indemnification of law enforcement officers, and other public servants, for death or disablement in line of duty, § 45-9-80 et seq.

Penalty for assault by officer of state under color of office or commission, § 45-11-3.

Reward for information leading to identification, apprehension, and conviction of persons who murder law enforcement officer, § 45-12-36.

Emergency telephone number “9-1-1” system, §

46-5-120

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Restoring Public Confidence in the Criminal Justice System:
Policing Prosecutions When Prosecutors Prosecute Police,” see 67 Emory L.J. 853 (2018).

For article, “Dead Canaries in the Coal Mines:
The Symbolic Assailant Revisited,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 513 (2018).